Utah statutes.
13-21-6.   Contents of statement.
The information statement required under Section 13-21-5 shall include all of
the following:
(1)  a complete and accurate statement of the buyer's right to review any file
on the buyer maintained by any credit reporting agency, as provided under 15
U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq., as amended, the Fair Credit Reporting Act;
(2)  a statement that a review of the file on the buyer will be conducted free
of charge by the credit reporting agency that issued a report upon which a
credit denial was based, if requested within 30 days of the buyer receiving a
notice of a denial of credit;
(3)  the approximate price the buyer will be charged by a credit reporting
agency for a copy of the file on the buyer;
(4)  a complete and accurate statement of the buyer's right to dispute the
completeness or accuracy of any item contained in any file on the buyer
maintained by any credit reporting agency;
(5)  a complete and detailed description of the services to be performed by
the credit services organization for the buyer and the total amount the buyer
will have to pay, or become obligated to pay, for the services;
(6)  a statement asserting the buyer's right to proceed against the bond or
trust account required under Section 13-21-3; and
(7)  the name and address of the surety company which issued the bond, or the
name and address of the depository and the trustee and the account number of
the trust account.
